src/morphology/stemparts/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_EKKE






0:ke    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ke    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:e    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:ke    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ke    N_COMPOUND_IN ;


LEXICON N_RAPPE






0:pe    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:pe    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:pe    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:pe    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pe    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:e    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pe    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:pe    N_COMPOUND_IN ;

LEXICON N_JEPPE






0:pe    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN   ;
0:pe    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pe    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:e    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:pe    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:pe    N_COMPOUND_IN ;


LEXICON N_LOTTE






0:te    N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te    N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:te    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:te    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:te    N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:te    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:te    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:e    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:te    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:te    N_COMPOUND_IN ;

LEXICON N_METTE






0:te    N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:te    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:e    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:te    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:te    N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:e    N_COMPOUND_N ;
0:te    N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:te    N_COMPOUND_IN ;




LEXICON N_KIRJA








0:a   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:o   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN      ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:o   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:o   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:a   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_YMPÄRYSTÄ








0:ä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN      ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;



LEXICON N_POLITIIKKA







0:ka  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ka  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ko N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ka   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:ko   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko   N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:ko   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ko   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_TIPPA







0:pa  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pa  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:po N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:pa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:po  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:po  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:po  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pa     N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:po   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_MITTA







0:ta  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ta  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ta   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta     N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_YRITTÄ







0:tä  N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tä  N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:tö N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:tö  N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:tö  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:tö  N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tä     N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tö   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_VIKA






0:ka  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ka  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:’a  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:a  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ko N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:’o   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ka   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:ko  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ko  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’a  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ko   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_VAAKA




0:ka  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ka  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:’a  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ko N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:’o   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ka   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:ko  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ko  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:’a  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ko   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;


LEXICON N_SALPA







0:pa  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pa  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:va  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:po N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:vo   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:pa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:po  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:po  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:po  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:va  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:po   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_PATA







0:ta  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ta  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:da  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:do   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ta   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:da  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_HALPA







0:pa  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pa  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:va  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:po N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:vo   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:pa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:po  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:po  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:po  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:va  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:po   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_LANKA







0:ka  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ka  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ga  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:ko N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:go   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ka   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:ko  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:ko  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ko  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ga  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ko   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_RAMPA







0:pa  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pa  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ma  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:po N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:mo   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:pa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:po  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:po  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:po  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ma  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:po   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_VALTA







0:ta  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ta  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:la  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:lo   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ta   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:la  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KUTSUNTA







0:ta  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ta  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:na  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:no   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ta   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:na  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KYSYNTÄ







0:tä  N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tä  N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:nä  N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:tö N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:nö   N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:tö  N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:tö  N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:tä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:tö  N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:nä  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:tö   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:tä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KERTA







0:ta  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ta  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ra  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:to N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ro   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ta   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:to  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:to  N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:to  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ra  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;





LEXICON N_SOITTAJA








0:a   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:a   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_HÖPÖTTÄJÄ







0:ä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_LUOKKA







0:ka   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a    N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:k   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ka   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:k   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:k   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:k   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;
